District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.183

Licensure of real estate organizations.

No real estate broker’s license shall be issued to any firm, franchise, partnership, association, or corporation unless the Mayor finds that:

(1)

The applicant is organized and exists pursuant to applicable District and federal laws;

(2)

Every person member, partner, trustee, or officer who is engaged in activities defined in this subsection is licensed under this subchapter;

(3)

Every employee who will render professional services holds a valid license or certificate issued by the Board; and

(4)

Every branch office is managed by a licensed real estate broker.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.183.